Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 8.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1019
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out its duties under the Low-Income Home Energy Conservation Act.

Laws 2008, LB1001, § 8.
January 1, 2009July 1, 2019